Maryland, session 2026, HB1444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1115.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT:
(1) IS LOCATED IN A WASHINGTON COUNTY AGRICULTURAL
(RURAL) OR RURAL VILLAGE ZONING DISTRICT; AND
(2) AS OF JUNE 1, 2026, IS SERVED BY A CONVENTIONAL ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM THAT UTILIZES A SEPTIC TANK.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1444*

HOUSE BILL 1444
(B) (1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, THE WASHINGTON COUNTY
HEALTH DEPARTMENT MAY EXEMPT THE OWNER OF A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
QUALIFYING UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FROM COMPLIANCE WITH
ALL OR PART OF A REGULATION UNDER COMAR 26.04.02, IF COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REGULATION WOULD BE UNDULY BURDENSOME.
(2) TO ESTABLISH THAT COMPLIANCE WITH A REGULATION WOULD
BE UNDULY BURDENSOME, AN APPLICANT SHALL DEMONSTRATE THAT THE UNIQUE
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PROPERTY, EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE, OR LOCATION
OF THE ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM AT ISSUE MAKES COMPLIANCE
FINANCIALLY OR PHYSICALLY IMPRACTICABLE.
(C) (1) AN APPLICATION FOR AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) BE SUBMITTED TO THE WASHINGTON COUNTY HEALTH
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) INCLUDE A REPORT COMPLETED BY AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED BY THE STATE BOARD OF ON–SITE WASTEWATER PROFESSIONALS
DESCRIBING THE BURDENS UNIQUE TO THE PROPERTY THAT MAKE COMPLIANCE
WITH SPECIFIC REGULATIONS UNDER COMAR 26.04.02 UNDULY BURDENSOME.
(2) THE WASHINGTON COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL
REVIEW AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND DETERMINE WHETHER COMPLYING WITH THE REGULATION OR REGULATIONS
SPECIFIED IN THE APPLICATION WOULD BE UNDULY BURDENSOME.
(3) IF THE WASHINGTON COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT COMPLYING WITH THE REGULATION OR REGULATIONS WOULD
BE UNDULY BURDENSOME, THE WASHINGTON COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT
SHALL ISSUE A PERMIT SPECIFYING THE CRITERIA FROM WHICH THE PROPERTY
OWNER IS EXEMPT.
(D) AN EXEMPTION GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROPERTY OWNER NAMED IN THE
APPLICATION AND DOES NOT RUN WITH THE PROPERTY;
(2) EXPIRES 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OR ON
REGISTERING A CHANGE IN TITLE TO THE PROPERTY, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1444 3
(3) MAY BE RENEWED AN UNLIMITED NUMBER OF TIMES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.